Utah statutes.
17-19a-203.   Budget officer.

The budget officer of a county is designated by:

(1)  in a county commission form of government described in Section 17-52-501 or an expanded county commission form of government described in Section 17-52-502, the county commission;

(2)  in the county executive-council form of government described in Section 17-52-504, the county executive; or

(3)  in the council-manager form of government described in Section 17-52-505, the county council.

